Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 16 Conservation Districts
§ 11-16-122.
Powers and duties of districts and supervisors thereof generally.

Each conservation district organized under this act shall make an annual estimate of the funds required by the district for conservation programs and present a certified copy of the estimate, along with a budget showing all anticipated income and expenses, to the county commissioners. District supervisors shall administer the finances of the district according to the provisions of the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act, except that an annual audit in accordance with W.S.

16-4-121

is not required. Each district shall comply with the provisions of W.S. 9-1-507(a)(iii).

A conservation district organized under this act and the supervisors thereof, in addition to other powers granted by this act, may:

Employ personnel and determine their duties and conditions of employment;

Call upon the attorney general of the state for legal services or employ their own counsel and legal staff;

Delegate to their chairman, to one (1) or more supervisors or to one (1) or more agents or employees such delegable powers and duties as they deem proper;

Furnish to the state conservation commission upon request, copies of ordinances, rules, regulations, orders, contracts, forms and other documents they adopt or employ, and such other information concerning their activities as it may require and to the county clerk copies of ordinances, rules, regulations and orders it adopts in accordance with law;

Conduct surveys, investigations and research and disseminate information relating to range management, the character of soil erosion, flood prevention or the conservation, development, utilization and disposal of water, and the preventive and control measures and works of improvement needed, but in order to avoid duplication of research activities, no district shall initiate any research program except in cooperation with the government of this state or its agencies, or with the United States or its agencies;

Conduct demonstration projects within the district on lands owned or controlled by this state or its agencies, with the cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction thereof, and on other lands within the district with the consent of the owner or occupier of the lands, to demonstrate range management practices, the means, methods and measures by which soil and soil resources may be conserved, and soil erosion in the form of soil blowing and washing may be prevented and controlled and works of improvement for flood prevention or the conservation, development, utilization and disposal of water may be carried out;

Carry out preventive and control measures and works of improvement within the district, including engineering operations, range management, methods of cultivation, the growing of grass or other vegetation, changes in use of land or any measure which may be developed for the control of erosion and better use of soil, and works of improvement for flood prevention or the conservation, development, utilization and disposal of water on lands owned or controlled by this state or its agencies, with the cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction thereof, or on other lands within the district with the consent of the owner or occupier of the lands;

Cooperate, including but not limited to representing the conservation district as a cooperating agency with special expertise as provided by the National Environmental Policy Act and in federal land planning implementation as provided in W.S. 11-16-135(a), enter into agreements with and furnish financial or other aid to, any agency, governmental or otherwise, or any owner or occupier of lands within the district, in carrying on range management or erosion control and prevention operations and works of improvement for flood prevention or the conservation, development, utilization and disposal of water within the district, subject to such conditions as the supervisors deem necessary;

through (xiii) Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 21, § 3.

Make available on terms it prescribes, to owners and occupiers of land within the district, agricultural and engineering machinery and equipment, fertilizer, seeds and seedlings, male breeding animals, livestock supplies and such other material or equipment as will assist the owners and occupiers of land to carry on operations upon their lands and upon those owned or leased by the district, for range improvement and stabilization, the conservation of soil and water resources, the prevention and control of soil erosion and for flood prevention or the conservation, development, utilization and disposal of water. The assistance authorized by this paragraph shall be on a limited scale for demonstration purposes and the district shall not be deemed authorized to compete with private industry;

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 21, § 3.

Develop and implement comprehensive resource use and management plans for range improvement and stabilization, conservation of soil, water and vegetative resources, control and prevention of soil erosion and for flood prevention or the conservation, development, utilization and disposal of water within the district, which plans shall include range management provisions and shall specify in detail the acts, procedures, performances and avoidances necessary or desirable to carry out the plans, including the specification of engineering operation, fence and stockwater developments, methods of cultivation, the growing of grass and other vegetation, cropping and range programs, tillage and grazing practices, and changes in use of lands. In developing plans under this paragraph, the supervisors of the district shall consider the customs and culture of residents of the district as those customs and culture relate to the land and resource, current and historical information and data related to the uses of the land and resource;

Make public the plans and information and bring them to the attention of owners and occupiers of land within the district;

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 21, § 3.

Manage, as agent of the United States or any of its agencies, and enter into agreements with the United States or any of its agencies, or this state or any of its agencies, to effect cooperation with the United States or any of its agencies under United States Public Law 566 approved August 4, 1954, or amendments thereto, in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation or administration of any land utilization, soil conservation, erosion control, erosion prevention, flood prevention projects, conservation of water, water utilization, disposal of water in watershed areas and other water projects within its boundaries;

Act as representative for local groups in dealing with the United States or its representatives, in soil or water conservation matters under United States Public Law 566 approved August 4, 1954, or amendments thereto;

Accept donations, gifts and contributions in money, services, materials or otherwise from any source which will impose no financial obligation upon the state, and use or expend the monies, services, materials or contributions in carrying on its operations;

Sue and be sued in the name of the district;

Have a seal, which shall be judicially noticed;

Have perpetual succession unless terminated as hereinafter provided;

Make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary to the exercise of its powers;

Make, amend and repeal rules and regulations not inconsistent with this act, to implement its purposes and powers;

As a condition to extending any benefits to or performance of work upon any land not owned or controlled by the state or its agencies, require contributions in money, services, materials or otherwise to any operations conferring benefits and require owners and occupiers of land to enter into and perform such agreements or covenants as to the permanent use of such lands as will prevent or control erosion and prevent flood water and sediment damages thereon and promote the best use of such lands;

The supervisors of a conservation district which has officially adopted a comprehensive plan pursuant to W.S. 11-16-122(b)(xvi) may coordinate with federal agencies as provided in the Federal Land Policy and Management Act of 1976, the Forest and Rangeland Renewable Resources Planning Act of 1974, as amended by the national Forest Management Act of 1976 and any other federal statute which provides for coordination with local governments and federal regulations adopted pursuant to those acts.

A conservation district shall not purchase or hold title to farm lands as defined by W.S. 11-34-101(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 34-1409; Laws 1955, ch. 71, § 1; ch. 130, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-245; Laws 1959, ch. 53, § 2; ch. 193, § 9; 1971, ch. 111, § 20; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-113

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 21, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 2013 ch. 125, § 2, effective March 13, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 4, § 1, effective March 7, 2018.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “including but not limited to representing the conservation district as a cooperating agency with special expertise as provided by the National Environmental Policy Act and in federal land planning implementation as provided in W.S. 11-16-135(a)” for “or” in (b)(viii); added “and implement,” “resource use and a management,” “and vegetative,” and the last sentence and made a stylistic change in (b)(xvi); and added (b)(xxviii).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added the last sentence of (a).

The 2018 amendment,

in (a), added “except that an annual audit in accordance with W.S.

16-4-121

is not required” at the end of the second sentence, added the final sentence, and made a related stylistic change.

Laws 2018, ch. 4, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 125, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2018, ch. 123, § 5, provides: “To the extent this act conflicts with 2018 House Bill 53, this act shall be given precedence and shall prevail over any conflicting provision.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout subsections (a) and (b), see § 11-16-102(a)(xii).

Public Law 566. —

Public Law 566, referred to in subsections (b)(xix) and (b)(xx), appears as 16 U.S.C. §§ 1001 through 1008.

§ 11-16-123.
Applicability of provisions concerning other agencies; validity of
contracts of supervisors.

No provisions with respect to the acquisition, operation or disposition of property by other public bodies are applicable to a district organized hereunder unless the legislature shall specifically so state.

No contract of the district supervisors for the payment of money is valid unless the supervisors have at the time the contract is made funds in cash, securities or deposits sufficient for the payment thereof.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 34-1409; Laws 1955, ch. 130, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-245; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-113

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-16-124.
Administration of oaths by secretary or treasurer of district.

The secretary or treasurer
of the district are severally authorized to administer oaths within
their district in any matter pertaining to the business of their district
where an oath is required by law.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 34-1409; W.S. 1957, § 11-245; Laws 1967, ch. 46, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-113

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§§ 11-16-125 through 11-16-131.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 21, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1941, ch. 134, §§ 10 through 13, related to conservation ordinances and the board of adjustment.

§ 11-16-132.
Publicly owned lands to be administered in cooperation with districts.

Agencies of the state,
county or any political subdivision of the state which have jurisdiction
over or are charged with the administration of any state, county or
other publicly owned lands lying within the boundaries of any district
organized hereunder, shall cooperate to the fullest extent with the
supervisors of the district to effect the programs and operations
undertaken by the supervisors under this act and may lease such lands
to a district. The supervisors of the districts shall be given free
access to enter and perform work upon the publicly owned lands. The
provisions of conservation ordinances have the force and effect of
law over all publicly owned lands, and shall be in all respects observed
by the agencies administering the lands.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 134, § 15; C.S. 1945, § 34-1415; W.S. 1957, § 11-250; W.S. 1977, §

11-19-118

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to leasing of state lands generally, see §§

36-5-101

to

36-5-117

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-16-102(a)(xii).

§ 11-16-133.
Tax levied on property in district; maximum amount; soil and water
conservation fund; other appropriation authorized.

Subject to W.S.

11-16-134

, the county commissioners may annually levy a tax to carry out this act. The tax shall be levied upon all property in the district and shall not exceed one (1) mill on each one dollar ($1.00) of assessed valuation. The tax is not part of the general county or city mill levies. The tax shall be levied and collected as other county taxes and the county treasurer shall remit the taxes collected to the district to a separate fund to be known as the conservation district fund, which shall be used only to carry out the purposes of this act.

Whether or not a tax levy is authorized under W.S.

11-16-134

, each board of county commissioners may make appropriations from the county general fund to districts established under this act for the purpose of providing soil and water conservation programs.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 21, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 11-16-102(a)(xii).

§ 11-16-134.
Imposition of tax; vote of electors required.

No tax shall be imposed under W.S.

11-16-133

until the proposition to impose the tax is submitted to a vote of the voters of the district and a majority of those casting their ballots vote in favor of imposing the tax. Any tax imposed under this act shall be levied in the year following the election at which the imposition of the tax is approved.

The proposition to impose a tax under this act shall be at the expense of the county and may be submitted to the voters of the county upon the receipt by the board of county commissioners of a petition requesting the election signed by a majority of the supervisors of the district. The election shall be at the direction and under the supervision of the board of county commissioners.

Subject to the limitation of subsection (b) of this section, the proposition to impose a tax under this act shall be submitted on an election date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

, or by mail ballot pursuant to W.S.

22-29-115

and

22-29-116

. A notice of election shall be given by the county clerk in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation published in the county wherein the election is to be held and shall specify the object of the election. The notice shall be published at least once each week for a thirty (30) day period preceding the election. At the election the ballots shall contain the words “for the conservation district tax” and “against the conservation district tax”. Upon the initial submission of the conservation district tax, or any renewal thereof, after July 1, 1995, the conservation district board of supervisors shall choose one (1) of the following options and the words of the chosen option shall be clearly printed in the appropriate area on the election ballot:

If this proposition is approved, the same proposition shall be submitted at the second following general election or by mail ballot pursuant to W.S.

22-29-115

and

22-29-116

, and thereafter at succeeding general elections or by mail ballot pursuant to W.S. 22-29-115 and 22-29-116, every four (4) years until the proposition is defeated; or

If this proposition is approved, the tax shall remain in effect until a petition to discontinue the tax, signed by not less than ten percent (10%) of the voters of the district, is received by the board of county commissioners, and the proposal to discontinue the tax is approved by the voters. The proposal to discontinue the tax shall be submitted to the voters of the district at the expense of the county at the next general election or by mail ballot pursuant to W.S. 22-29-115 and 22-29-116 for approval or disapproval.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 131, § 1; 1995, ch. 180, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to the definition of “commission” see §

11-16-102

and notes thereunder.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 11-16-102(a)(xii).

§ 11-16-135.
Special expertise of supervisors of conservation districts.

When representing a conservation
district as a cooperating agency in matters related to the National
Environmental Policy Act and in federal land planning, implementation
and management actions, supervisors of a conservation district shall
be deemed to have special expertise on all subject matters for which
they have statutory responsibility as provided in W.S.

11-16-122

, including but not limited to all subject matters directly
or indirectly related to stabilization of the agriculture industry,
protection of natural resources including but not limited to data
and information, conservation of soil and water resources, control
and prevention of soil erosion, flood prevention or the conservation,
development, utilization and disposal of water within the district.

History.

2013 ch. 125, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

Effective date. —

Laws 2013, ch. 125, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.